Hawaii statutes.
§412:9-202 Prohibitions. Except as
otherwise expressly authorized by this chapter, a financial services loan
company shall not:

(1) Employ its funds, directly or indirectly, in
trade or commerce by buying or selling ordinary goods, chattels, wares, and
merchandise, or by owning or operating industrial or manufacturing plants of
any kind;

(2) Issue commercial letters of credit;

(3) Sell real estate, securities, or insurance; or

(4) Engage in any activity requiring a charter as a
trust company under article 8. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next